District of Columbia statutes.
7-651.12

Prohibitions and penalties.

Any person who falsifies or forges a comfort care order, willfully conceals or withholds personal knowledge of the revocation of a comfort care order contrary to the wishes of a person who has executed a comfort care order, or places a comfort care bracelet on a person for whom a comfort care order has not been executed in accordance with § 7-651.02(a) and (b), and who, because of the forgery, concealment, withholding, or placement, directly causes resuscitation to be withheld or withdrawn from a person and the death of the person to be hastened shall be subject to prosecution for unlawful homicide pursuant to § 22-2101.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-224, § 13, 48 DCR 27